North Carolina, session 2025, HB894.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, "Council" means the State
Building Code Council, "Code" means the current North Carolina State Building Code collection
and amendments to the Code, as adopted by the Council, "door lock requirements" means the
door lock requirements of the means of egress provisions of the Code, and "local inspection
department" means the entity in charge of fire code enforcement for a unit of local government.
SECTION 1.(b) Rulemaking. – The Council shall adopt rules to amend the Code to
provide an exemption from the door lock requirements for business entities licensed to sell
firearms as a federal firearms dealer that are primarily engaged in the business of selling firearms
or ammunition when issued a permit to that effect by the local fire code official. In amending
rules pursuant to this subsection, the Council shall ensure that the exemption from the door lock
requirements is applicable only during nonbusiness hours when the business is closed to the
public. Until the effective date of the rules to amend the Code that the Council is required to
adopt pursuant to this section, the Council and local governments enforcing the Code shall follow
the provisions of subsection (c) of this section as they relate to compliance with the door lock
requirements of the means of egress provisions of the Code.
SECTION 1.(c) Exemption Requirements. – The fire code official shall issue a
permit to a business entity licensed to sell firearms as a federal firearms dealer that is primarily
engaged in the business of selling firearms or ammunition providing an exemption from the door
lock requirements as set forth in this subsection:
(1) The business entity must pay a permit fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00) to
the local inspection department and meet the following requirements:
a. The business has a sales floor and customer occupancy space that is
contained on one floor and is no larger than 15,000 square feet of retail
sales space. For purposes of this sub-subdivision, retail sales space is
that area where firearms or ammunition are displayed and
merchandised for sale to the public.
b. The business is equipped with an approved smoke, fire, and break-in
alarm system installed and operated in accordance with the
requirements of the fire code official. An approved smoke, fire, or
break-in alarm system does not have to include an automatic door
*H894-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
unlocking mechanism triggered when the smoke, fire, or break-in
alarm system is triggered.
c. The owner or operator of the business provides to all employees within
the later of (i) 10 days of the issuance of the permit under this section
or, (ii) at the time the employee is hired, a written facility locking plan
applicable for the close of business each day.
d. Each entrance to the business is posted with a sign conspicuously
located that warns that the building is exempt from the door lock
requirements of the North Carolina State Building Code during
nonbusiness hours only and that doors will remain locked from the
inside even in the case of fire.
(2) The local inspection department shall file copies of permits issued pursuant to
this section with all local law enforcement and fire protection agencies that
provide protection for the business entity.
(3) The local inspection department shall be responsible for any inspections
necessary for the issuance of permits under this section and shall be
responsible for periodic inspections to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this section.
(4) The local inspection department shall revoke a permit issued under this section
upon a finding that the requirements for the original issuance of the permit are
not being complied with or upon a finding that the business entity has failed
to limit its use of the exemption from the door lock requirements of the means
of egress provisions of the Code to nonbusiness hours when the business is
closed to the public.
SECTION 1.(d) Scope. – Subsection (c) of this section does not apply to business
entities licensed to sell firearms as a federal firearms dealer that are primarily engaged in the
business of selling firearms or ammunition and have received prior authorization from the local
fire code official to use an alternative means or method of achieving compliance with the door
lock requirements of the means of egress provisions of the Code.
SECTION 1.(e) Sunset. – Subsection (c) of this section expires when the permanent
rules adopted as required by subsection (b) of this section become effective.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 894-Second Edition